Missouri, session 2026, SB1662.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.547, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 67.547
and 67.5420, to read as follows:
67.547. 1. In addition to the tax authorized by
section 67.505, any county as defined in section 67.750 may,
by a majority vote of its governing body, impose an
additional county sales tax on all sales which are subject
to taxation under the provisions of sections 144.010 to
144.525. The tax authorized by this section shall be in
addition to any and all other sales tax allowed by law;
except that no ordinance or order imposing a sales tax under
the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the
governing body of the county submits to the voters of the
county, at a county or state general, primary or special
election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
county to impose such tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need
not be limited to the following language:

SB 1662 2
Shall the county of ______ (county's name)
impose a countywide sales tax of ______
(insert rate) percent for the purpose of
______ (insert purpose)?
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
opposed to the question, place an "X" in the
box opposite "NO".
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments
thereto shall be in effect. If a majority of the votes cast
by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal,
then the governing body of the county shall have no power to
impose the sales tax as herein authorized unless and until
the governing body of the county submits another proposal to
authorize the governing body of the county to impose the
sales tax under the provisions of this section and such
proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting thereon. A county shall not submit to the voters a
proposed sales tax under this section for a period of two
years from the date of an election in which the county
previously submitted to the voters a proposed sales tax
under this section, regardless of whether the initial
proposed sales tax was approved or disapproved by the
voters. The revenue collected from the sales tax authorized
under this section shall only be used for the purpose
approved by voters of the county.

SB 1662 3
3. (1) The sales tax may be imposed at a rate of one-
eighth of one percent, one-fourth of one percent, three-
eighths of one percent, or one-half of one percent on the
receipts from the sale at retail of all tangible personal
property or taxable services at retail within any county
adopting such tax if such property and services are subject
to taxation by the state of Missouri under the provisions of
sections 144.010 to 144.525. In any city not within a
county or any county described in subsection 5 of this
section, no sales tax for the purpose of funding zoological
activities and zoological facilities as those terms are
defined in section 184.500 shall exceed a rate of one-eighth
of one percent unless the sales tax was levied and collected
before August 28, 2017. Beginning August 28, 2017, no
county shall submit to the voters any proposal that results
in a combined rate of sales taxes adopted under this section
in excess of one percent.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1)
of this subsection to the contrary, beginning August 28,
2025, a county with more than eight thousand but fewer than
eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than seven hundred thirty but fewer than
eight hundred inhabitants may impose a sales tax that
results in a combined rate of sales tax adopted pursuant to
this section in excess of one percent, but not in excess of
one and one-half percent, provided that any such sales tax
shall be for the purpose of providing law enforcement
services. All sales tax elections conducted during the
November 8, 2022, general election shall be deemed in
compliance with this subdivision, provided that the total
combined sales tax rate adopted pursuant to this section
does not exceed one and one-half percent.

SB 1662 4
4. Except as modified in this section, all provisions
of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed
under this section.
5. In any first class county having a charter form of
government and having a population of nine hundred thousand
or more, the proceeds of the sales tax authorized by this
section shall be distributed so that an amount equal to
three-eighths of the proceeds of the tax shall be
distributed to the county and the remaining five-eighths
shall be distributed to the cities, towns and villages and
the unincorporated area of the county on the ratio that the
population of each bears to the total population of the
county. Three-eighths of the tax rate adopted by such a
county shall be included in the calculation of the county's
one percent combined tax rate ceiling provided in subsection
3 of this section. The population of each city, town or
village and the unincorporated area of the county and the
total population of the county shall be determined on the
basis of the most recent federal decennial census. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the revenue
collected is used to support zoological activities of the
zoological subdistrict as defined under section 184.352.
The provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the
100 revenue collected is used for the purpose of early childhood
101 education services, and such revenues shall be deposited in
102 the early childhood education fund and administered pursuant
103 to section 67.5420.
104 6. Except as prohibited under section 184.353,
105 residents of any county that does not adopt a sales tax
106 under this section for the purpose of supporting zoological
107 activities may be charged an admission fee for zoological
108 facilities, programs, or events that are not part of the

SB 1662 5
109 zoological subdistrict defined under subdivision (15) of
110 section 184.352 as of August 28, 2017.
111 7. In any county of the second classification with
112 more than nineteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
113 nineteen thousand eight hundred inhabitants, the proceeds of
114 the sales tax authorized by this section shall be
115 distributed so that an amount equal to three-fourths of the
116 proceeds of the tax shall be distributed to the county and
117 the remaining one-fourth shall be distributed equally among
118 the incorporated cities, towns, and villages of the county.
119 Upon request from any city, town, or village within the
120 county, the county shall make available for inspection the
121 distribution report provided to the county by the department
122 of revenue. Any expenses incurred by the county in
123 supplying such report to a city, town, or village shall be
124 paid by such city, town, or village.
125 8. In any first class county having a charter form of
126 government and having a population of nine hundred thousand
127 or more, no tax shall be imposed pursuant to this section
128 for the purpose of funding in whole or in part the
129 construction, operation or maintenance of a sports stadium,
130 field house, indoor or outdoor recreational facility,
131 center, playing field, parking facility or anything
132 incidental or necessary to a complex suitable for any type
133 of professional sport or recreation, either upon, above or
134 below the ground.
135 9. No county in this state, other than a county with a
136 charter form of government and with more than nine hundred
137 fifty thousand inhabitants and a city not within a county,
138 shall impose a tax under this section for the purpose of
139 funding in whole or in part the construction, operation, or
140 maintenance of any zoological activities, zoological

SB 1662 6
141 facilities, zoological organizations, the metropolitan
142 zoological park and museum district as created under section
143 184.350, or any zoological boards.
144 10. The director of revenue may authorize the state
145 treasurer to make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund
146 and credited to any county for erroneous payments and
147 overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and
148 drafts deposited to the credit of such counties. If any
149 county abolishes the tax, the county shall notify the
150 director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior
151 to the effective date of the repeal and the director of
152 revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
153 of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after
154 receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
155 overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and
156 drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one
157 year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of
158 the tax in such county, the director of revenue shall remit
159 the balance in the account to the county and close the
160 account of that county. The director of revenue shall
161 notify each county of each instance of any amount refunded
162 or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
163 11. No revenue received from a tax for the purpose of
164 funding zoological activities in any county shall be used
165 for the benefit of any entity that has ever been named
166 Grant's Farm or is located at ten thousand five hundred one
167 Gravois Road, Saint Louis, Missouri, or successor address,
168 or to supplant any funding received from the metropolitan
169 zoological park and museum district established under
170 section 184.350.
67.5420. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, all revenues generated by any tax imposed by a

SB 1662 7
county or by a city not within a county and approved by the
voters for the purposes of establishing an early childhood
education fund to improve the quality of, affordability of,
and access to early childhood development programs for
children aged five years and younger shall be deposited in
the county treasury or, in a city not within a county, to a
board of directors established pursuant to section 210.861,
to the credit of a special "Early Childhood Education Fund"
to accomplish the purposes set out in this section and shall
be used for no other purpose.
2. (1) The administrative control and management of
the funds in the early childhood education fund and all
programs to be funded therefrom shall rest solely with the
board of directors established pursuant to section 210.861.
The board shall not be mandated to expend funds by an act of
state legislation without a majority vote of the voters of
the county or city not within a county. The board of
directors shall use or disburse the funds in the early
childhood education fund to provide and administer programs
improving the quality, affordability, and access to early
childhood development programs for children aged five years
and younger, prioritizing children in financial need. The
funds may be used for early childhood education and child
care provided by public, private, not-for-profit, and for-
profit entities licensed, contracted to receive child care
subsidies, or otherwise registered by the Missouri
department of elementary and secondary education, including
preschools, child care centers, nursery schools, local
education agencies, charter schools, Head Start and Early
Head Start programs, informal child care providers and
independent and system-affiliated family child care homes,
and transportation related to same.

SB 1662 8
(2) The board of directors may contract with any
person or entity to provide programs or services relating to
the programs described in subdivision (1) of this subsection
and may place conditions on the use of such funds. The
board shall reserve the right to audit the expenditure of
any and all funds. The board may establish eligibility
standards for the receipt and use of such funds. No member
of the board shall serve on the governing body, have any
financial interest in, or be employed by any entity that is
a recipient of funds from the early childhood education fund.
(3) The board of directors may accept any gift of
property or moneys for the use and benefit of the persons to
be served through the programs established and funded under
this section and may sell or exchange any such property so
long as such sale or exchange is in the best interests of
the programs provided under this section and the proceeds
from such sale or exchange are used exclusively to fund such
programs. The board of directors may solicit, accept, and
expend grants from private or public entities and enter into
agreements to effectuate such grants so long as the
transaction is in the best interest of the programs provided
by the board and the proceeds are used exclusively to fund
such programs.
(4) The provisions of subsections 3 to 6 of section
210.861 shall not apply to revenues deposited into the early
childhood education fund and administered pursuant to this
subsection.
✓